Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2416.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of public safety; local border support The sum of $20,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of public safety for local border support. The department shall use the monies appropriated by this section to fund: 1. Local law enforcement officer positions for border drug interdiction to deter and apprehend any individuals who are charged with drug trafficking, human smuggling, illegal immigration and other border-related crimes. 2. Grants to cities, towns and counties for costs associated with prosecuting and detaining persons who are charged with drug trafficking, human smuggling, illegal immigration and other border-related crimes. 3. All capital-related equipment.